District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-107.01

Purchase of dissociated partner’s interest.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 701, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-157.1.